Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1931.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [515B.3-123] ATTORNEY GENERAL ENFORCEMENT. new text end new text begin The attorney general has authority under section 8.31 to investigate and prosecute violations of this chapter. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end